en: Cereal starches
de: Getreidestärke
es: Almidones de cereales, Almidón de cereales
fi: Viljatärkkelykset
fr: Amidons de céréales
hr: Škrobovi žitarica
it: Amidi di cereali
lt: Grūdų krakmolas
nl: Graanzetmelen

en: Corn starch, Cornstarch, Cornflour, Maize starch
bg: Царевично нишесте
de: Maisstärke, Speisestärke
es: Almidón de maíz
fi: Maissitärkkelys
fr: Amidon de maïs, Fécule de maïs
hr: Kukuruzni škrob
it: Amido di mais
ja: コーンスターチ
lt: Kukurūzų krakmolas
nl: Maïszetmelen
pt: Amido de milho

en: Rice starch
de: Reisstärke
es: Almidón de arroz
fr: Amidon de riz
hr: Rižin škrob
lt: Ryžių krakmolas
nl: Rijstzetmelen

en: Wheat starch
de: Weizenstärke
es: Almidón de trigo
fr: Amidon de blé
hr: Pšenični škrob
lt: Kviečių krakmolas
nl: Tarwezetmelen

en: Groats
de: Graupen
es: Grañones
fi: Rouheet
fr: Gruau
hr: Griz
it: Semola
lt: Kruopos
nl: Grutten
pl: Kasza, Kasze
ru: Крупы

en: Buckwheat groats
es: Grañones de trigo sarraceno
fr: Gruau de sarrasin
hr: Heljdina krupica
lt: Grikių kruopos
nl: Boekweitgrutten
ru: Гречневые крупы, Гречневая крупа, Крупы гречневые, Крупа гречневая

en: Oat groats
de: Hafergrütze
es: Grañones de avena
fr: Gruau d'avoine
hr: Zobena krupica
lt: Avižinės kruopos
nl: Havergrutten

en: Millet groats
es: Grañones de mijo
fr: Gruau de millet
hr: Proso krupica
lt: Sorų kruopos
nl: Gierstgrutten

en: Rye groats
es: Grañones de centeno
fr: Gruau de seigle
hr: Ražena prekrupa
lt: Ruginės kruopos
nl: Roggegrutten

en: Wheat groats
de: Weizengraupen
es: Grañones de trigo
fi: Vehnärouheet
fr: Gruau de blé
hr: Pšenična krupica
it: Semola di frumento
lt: Kvietinės kruopos
nl: Tarwegrutten

en: Bulgur, wheat bulgur, bulgur wheat
xx: Bulgur
ar: برغل
az: bulqur
be: булгур
bg: Булгур
de: Bulgur, Bulgurweizen
el: πλιγούρι
eo: bulguro
fa: بلغور
fi: bulgur, bulgurvehnä
fr: Boulghours, Boulghour, Bulgur, Boulgours, Boulgour de blé
he: בורגול
hi: दलिया
hu: bulgur, török rizs, tört búza
hy: բլղուր
ja: ブルグル
kk: булгур
ko: 불구르
ku: savar
la: purgurium
lt: Bulguras
mk: булгур
nl: Bulgur, Burghul, Boergoel
pt: bulgur, triguilho
ru: булгур
uk: булгур
zh: 布格麦

en: Unsalted cooked wheat bulgur
fr: Boulgour de blé cuit non salé

en: Durum wheat groats
es: Grañones de trigo duro
fr: Gruau de blé dur
hr: Krupica durum pšenice
nl: Harde-tarwe grutten

en: Cereal butters
es: Mantecas de cereales
fi: viljarasvat
fr: Purées de céréales, Beurres de céréales
hr: Maslaci od žitarica
it: Burri di cereali
lt: Grūdų sviestai
nl: Pastas van granen
pt: Manteigas de cereais

en: Tahini, Sesame seed butters, Mashed sesame, Tahini sesame paste
bg: Тахан, Сусамов тахан
de: Tahin, Sesammus
es: Tahinis, Tahini, Tahina, Tahin, Mantecas de semilla de sésamo
fi: Tahini
fr: Purées de sésame, Tahini, Tahina, Tahin, Purée de sésame
he: טחינה, ממרח שומשום, שומשום טחון, ממרח טחינה
hr: Tahini
it: Tahina
ja: 芝麻醤, チーマージャン, タヒーニ, タヒーナ
lt: Sezamo sviestai
nl: Sesampastas, Tahini, Tahina, Tahin

en: White tahini, Mashed white sesame
es: Tahinis blancos
fr: Purées de sésame blanc, Tahini blanc
hr: Bijeli tahini
nl: Witte sesampastas

fr: Purées de sésame demi-complet, Purées de sésame semi-complet
nl: Half-volkoren sesampastas

en: Whole tahini
fr: Purées de sésame complet

en: Seitan
xx: Seitan
es: Seitanes, Seitán
ja: グルテンミート, セイタン
nl: Seitans

en: Potato flours, Flour of potatoes
bg: Картофено брашно
da: Kartoffelmel
fi: Perunajauhot
fr: Farines de pommes de terre
hr: Krumpirovo brašno
it: Farine di patate
lt: Bulvių miltai
nl: Aardappelmelen
sv: Potatismjöl